District of Columbia statutes.
16-2386

Notice.

(a)

When a motion for permanent guardianship is filed, the court shall promptly set a time for an adjudicatory hearing and shall cause notice thereof to be given to all parties.

(b)

The court shall direct the issuance to and personal service upon the child’s parents of a summons and a copy of the motion for permanent guardianship.

(c)

When it is appropriate to the proper disposition of the case, the court may direct the service of a summons upon other persons.

(d)

If personal service under this section cannot be effected, then notice shall be made constructively pursuant to rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 3(b), 48 DCR 1637

For temporary (225 day) addition of subchapter V, “Permanent Guardianship”, consisting of §§ 16-2381 to 16-2399., see § 3(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-208, April 4, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3239).

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).